New Jersey, session 222, S2968.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: "Group R-2 occupancy" means a residential occupancy containing sleeping units or more than two dwelling units where the occupants are primarily permanent in nature. b.    Notwithstanding any provision of the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), the State Uniform Construction Code, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing body of a municipality may adopt an ordinance or resolution to allow a single exit stairway to serve no more than six stories of a Group R-2 occupancy in the same building.  The first floor of such a structure may be used for a purpose other than residential use, provided that use is classified by the commissioner as a nonhazardous occupancy and is served by entrances that are separate from those serving the residential floors.  This section shall apply to new applications for development of residential structures submitted on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     Notwithstanding the limitations established in section 1 of P.L.2011, c.215 (C.52:14B-3a) concerning the use of regulatory guidance documents, and pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2011, c.215 (C.52:14B-3a), the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt a regulatory guidance publication for the governing body of a municipality, and publish the regulatory guidance on the Internet website of the Department of Community Affairs, which regulatory guidance shall include a model ordinance for the governing body of a municipality to utilize when acting pursuant to the subsection b. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, except the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall be permitted to take anticipatory action necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.